Louisiana, session 2026, HB973.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 17:2925(A)(1), (3), (6), and (7) are hereby amended and reenacted
to read as follows:
§2925. Individual graduation plans
A.(1) By the end of the eighth grade, every student, with the assistance of his
parent or legal guardian and school counselor or career coach, and for a student with
an exceptionality as defined in R.S. 17:1942, except a student identified as gifted or
talented and who has no other exceptionality, the student's Individualized Education
Program team, if applicable, shall begin to develop an Individual Graduation Plan
to guide the next academic year's course work and to assist the student in exploring
educational and career possibilities and in making appropriate secondary and
postsecondary education decisions as part of an overall postsecondary plan.
* * *
Page 1 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1542 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 973
(3) By the end of the tenth grade, each student's Individual Graduation Plan,
based on the student's academic record, talents, and interests, shall outline high
school graduation requirements relevant to the student's chosen postsecondary goals.
Each student, with the assistance of his parent or legal guardian and school counselor
or career coach, shall choose the high school curriculum framework and related
graduation requirements that best meet his postsecondary goals. Each student's
Individual Graduation Plan or the student's Individualized Education Program, if
applicable, shall include the recommended sequence of courses for successful
completion of a standard diploma.
* * *
(6) Upon completion of the review, the plan shall be signed by the student,
his parent or legal guardian, and the school counselor or career coach.
(7) Prior to revising a student's Individual Graduation Plan, the school
counselor or career coach shall meet individually with the student's parent or legal
guardian either in person or virtually to explain the possible impacts the revisions to
the plan might have on the student's graduation requirements and postsecondary
education goals unless notified by the parent or legal guardian that the parent or legal
guardian chooses not to have this meeting. Any revisions to a student's plan shall be
approved in writing by the student's parent or legal guardian.
* * *